Utah statutes.
10-8-47.   Intoxication -- Fights -- Disorderly conduct -- Assault and battery -- Petit larceny -- Riots and disorderly assemblies -- Firearms and fireworks -- False pretenses and embezzlement -- Sale of liquor, narcotics or tobacco to minors -- Possession of controlled substances -- Treatment of alcoholics and narcotics or drug addicts.

They may prevent intoxication, fighting, quarreling, dog fights, cockfights, prize fights, bullfights, and all disorderly conduct and provide against and punish the offenses of assault and battery and petit larceny; they may restrain riots, routs, noises, disturbances or disorderly assemblies in any street, house or place in the city; they may regulate and prevent the discharge of firearms, rockets, powder, fireworks or any other dangerous or combustible material; they may provide against and prevent the offense of obtaining money or property under false pretenses and the offense of embezzling money or property in all cases where the money or property embezzled or obtained under false pretenses does not exceed in value the sum of $100 and may prohibit the sale, giving away or furnishing of intoxicating liquors or narcotics, or of tobacco to any person under 21 years of age; cities may, by ordinance, prohibit the possession of controlled substances as defined in the Utah Controlled Substances Act, provided the conduct is not a class A misdemeanor or felony, and provide for treatment of alcoholics, narcotic addicts and other persons who are addicted to the use of drugs or intoxicants such that they substantially lack the capacity to control their use of the drugs or intoxicants, and judicial supervision may be imposed as a means of effecting their rehabilitation.

